Massachusetts, session 194th, S2288.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 8 of the of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out sections 34 and 112.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1